nl: Gespannen status: Gedeeltelijk bespannen; Bespannen; Onbespannen; Overig
de: Besaitungsstatus: Halb bespannt; Bespannt; Unbespannt; Andere
fi: Jännetiedot: Osittain jännitetty; Jännitetty; Jännittämätön; Muu
el: Κατάσταση πλέγματος: Ημι-πλεγμένο; Πλεγμένο; Άπλεχτο; Άλλο
tr: İpli durumu: Yarı kordajlı; Kordajlı; Kordajsız; Diğer
pt-BR: Encordoamento status: Semiencordoado; Encordoado; Não encordoado; Outro
bg-BG: Състояние на оплитането: Полунаплетена; Наплетена; Ненаплетена; Друго
nb: Strengstatus: Halvstrenget; Med strenger; Uten strenger; Annet
hu: Húrozottsági állapot: Félig húrozott; Húrozott; Húrozatlan; Egyéb
ja: ストリングステータス: セミストリング; ストリング張り上げ; ストリングなし; その他
th: สถานะการขึ้นเอ็น: ขึ้นเอ็นครึ่งเดียว; ขึ้นเอ็นแล้ว; ยังไม่ขึ้นเอ็น; อื่นๆ
en: Strung status: Semi-strung; Strung; Unstrung; Other
ko: 스트링 상태: 반스트링; 스트링; 언스트링; 기타
zh-CN: 穿线状态: 半穿弦; 已穿弦; 未穿弦; 其他
hr-HR: Status zategnutosti: Djelomično našpanano; Sa žicama (našpanano); Bez žica (nije našpanano); Ostalo
pt-PT: Estado de encordoamento: Semicordado; Com cordas; Sem cordas; Outro
pl: Stan siatki: Półnaciągnięta; Z naciągiem; Bez naciągu; Inny
sv: Strängstatus: Halvsträngad; Strängad; Osträngad; Övrigt
ro-RO: Stadiu de racordare: Semiracordat; Racordat; Neracordat; Altele
da: Opstrengningsstatus: Halvopstrenget; Opstrenget; Uden strenge; Andet
lt-LT: Suvėrimo būsena: Pusiau su stygomis; Su stygomis; Be stygų; Kita
zh-TW: 穿線狀態: 半穿線; 已穿線; 未穿線; 其他
sl-SI: Status napetosti strun: Na pol napeto; Napeto; Nenapeto; Drugo
es: Estado de la cuerda: Semiencordado; Encordado; Sin encordar; Otro
fr: État de cordage: Semi-cordée; Cordée; Non cordée; Autre
ru: Состояние натяжки: Частично натянутые струны; С натянутыми струнами; Без струн; Другое
sk-SK: Stav výpletu: Polovypletená; Vypletená; Nevypletená; Iné
vi: Trạng thái chuỗi: Đan dây một phần; Đã đan dây; Chưa đan dây; Khác
cs: Stav výpletu: Částečně vypletená; Vypletená; Nevypletená; Jiné
it: Stato delle corde: Semi-incordato; Incordato; Non incordato; Altro